Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-133
Warrants; specify fund upon which drawn.

Each warrant issued shall specify the fund upon which it is drawn.

Laws 1879, § 35, p. 365;

R.S.1913, § 963;

C.S.1922, § 863;

C.S.1929, § 26-117;

Laws 1939, c. 23, § 1, p. 123;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-117;

R.S.1943, § 23-133;

Laws 1963, c. 110, § 1, p. 438.

County treasurer is without authority to liquidate claims against county. Woods v. Brown County, 125 Neb. 256, 249 N.W. 601 (1933).

Purpose is to guard against overdrawing. National Life Ins. Co. v. Dawes County, 67 Neb. 40, 93 N.W. 187 (1903).

Officers are liable for warrant in excess of limit. Bacon v. Dawes County, 66 Neb. 191, 92 N.W. 313 (1902).

Warrant must show on face amount levied. Patterson v. State ex rel. Dusenbery, 2 Neb. Unof. 765, 89 N.W. 989 (1902).